Georgia, session 2025_26, HB907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 31C of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the
"Completion Special Schools Act," is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"20-2-2096.9.
(a) Each local school system with all or part of its territory within the attendance zone of
one or more operating completion special schools shall:
H. B. 907
- 1 -

LC 49 2420
(1) Be a party to a collaborative operating agreement with at least one such operating
completion special school; or
(2) Provide education programs and services to students in grades nine through 12,
including, but not limited to:
(A) Dropout prevention and academic intervention programs;
(B) Programs for high school credit recovery; and
(C) Opportunities for students to schedule classes on weekdays, evenings, and
weekends.
(b)(1) Each local school system with all or part of its territory within the attendance zone
of one or more operating completion special schools shall provide to each such operating
completion special school the full name and last known address and telephone number
for each student in grades nine through 12 who:
(A) Does not attend the public school in which he or she is enrolled for a period of ten
consecutive school days; or
(B) Withdraws from school pursuant to Code Section 20-2-690.1.
(2) The information required in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be provided by
each such local school system to each such operating completion special school no later
than ten school days after either condition provided for in subparagraph (A) or (B) of
paragraph (1) of this subsection is met.
(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall not apply to any student:
(A) Who has successfully completed all requirements for a high school diploma or a
state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma; or
(B) Whose parent or guardian has provided such local school system within the
preceding 45 school days a notice of intent to enroll such student in another local school
system or in a home study program."
H. B. 907
- 2 -

LC 49 2420
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 907
- 3 -